Washington statutes.
RCW 9.41.225

Use of machine gun or bump-fire stock in felony—Penalty.

(1) It is unlawful for a person, in the commission or furtherance of a felony other than a violation of RCW 9.41.190, to discharge a machine gun or to menace or threaten with a machine gun, another person.

(2) It is unlawful for a person, in the commission or furtherance of a felony other than a violation of RCW 9.41.190, to discharge a firearm containing a bump-fire stock or to menace or threaten another person with a firearm containing a bump-fire stock.

(3) A violation of this section shall be punished as a class A felony under chapter 9A.20 RCW.

[ 2018 c 7 s 5; 1989 c 231 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2018 c 7: See note following RCW 9.41.010.

Intent—1989 c 231: "The legislature is concerned about the increasing number of drug dealers, gang members, and other dangerous criminals who are increasingly being found in possession of machine guns. The legislature recognizes that possession of machine guns by dangerous criminals represents a serious threat to law enforcement officers and the general public. The use of a machine gun in furtherance of a felony is a particularly heinous crime because of the potential for great harm or death to a large number of people. It is the intent of the legislature to protect the public safety by deterring the illegal use of machine guns in the furtherance of a felony by creating a separate offense with severe penalties for such use of a machine gun." [ 1989 c 231 s 1.]